Georgia, session 2025_26, SB93.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-153.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Georgia Early
Literacy Act," is amended by revising paragraphs (4) and (8) and adding a new paragraph
to subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(4) 'High-quality instructional materials' means instructional materials aligned to the
science of reading that instruct students in foundational literacy skills and
grade-appropriate English language arts and reading standards approved by the State
S. B. 93
- 1 -

LC 49 2323S (SCS)
Board of Education. Instructional materials that include the use of the three-cueing
system shall not constitute high-quality instructional materials."
"(8) 'Structured literacy' means an evidence based approach to teaching oral and written
language aligned to the science of reading founded on the science of how children learn
to read and characterized by explicit, systematic, cumulative, and diagnostic instruction
in phonology, sound-symbol association, syllable instruction, morphology, syntax, and
semantics. An approach to teaching oral and written language that features or promotes
the three-cueing system shall not constitute structured literacy.
(8.1) 'Three-cueing system' means any model of teaching students to read based on
meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues. Such model or method may also be
referred to as MSV."
SECTION 2.
Said Code section is further amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (d) to read
as follows:
"(6) Except as expressly agreed to by the parent or guardian of a nonverbal student as
part of such student's Individualized Education Program, instruction in public schools and
local school systems shall not employ the three-cueing system or visual memory as a
basis for teaching word reading. Instruction may include visual information and
strategies which improve background and experiential knowledge, add context, and
increase oral language and vocabulary to support comprehension, but shall not be used
to teach word reading."
SECTION 3.
Said Code section is further amended by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
S. B. 93
- 2 -

LC 49 2323S (SCS)
"(d.1) The Professional Standards Commission shall adopt rules which establish criteria
for core curricula for each state approved educator preparation program. Such rules shall
include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) The use of content standards established by the State Board of Education that are
aligned to the science of reading to guide curricula and instruction;
(2) Evidence based standards for the teaching of reading that:
(A) Are exclusively aligned with the science of reading;
(B) Prepare teachers to provide explicit, systematic, sequential, and cumulative
approaches to teaching phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and text
comprehension; and
(C) Employ multisensory and multimodal intervention strategies;
(3) Content literacy and mathematics practices;
(4) Strategies appropriate for the instruction of English language learners;
(5) Strategies appropriate for the instruction of students with disabilities;
(6) Strategies to differentiate instruction based on student needs;
(7) Strategies and practices to support research based content aligned to state standards
and grading practices;
(8) Strategies appropriate for the early identification of a student with a reading
deficiency; and
(9) Strategies to support the use of technology in education and distance learning."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 93
- 3 -